Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.080

Compelling performance.

In case of a judgment to compel a party to execute a conveyance of real estate, the court may enforce the judgment by attachment or sequestration, or appoint a commissioner to make the conveyance.

[Code 1881 s 535; 1877 p 112 s 539; 1854 p 205 s 397; RRS s 612.]